Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 133. PRESUMPTION OF DEATH

Sec. 133.001. SEVEN-YEAR ABSENCE. Any person absenting himself for seven successive years shall be presumed dead unless it is proved that the person was alive within the seven-year period.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 3.15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Civil Practice & Remedies Code Sec. 131.001 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(4), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 133.002. ARMED SERVICES CERTIFICATE OF DEATH. If a branch of the armed services issues a certificate declaring a person dead, the date of death is presumed to have occurred for all purposes as stated in the certificate. The certificate may be admitted in any court of competent jurisdiction as prima facie evidence of the date and place of the person's death.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 3.15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Civil Practice & Remedies Code Sec. 131.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(4), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 133.003. RESTORATION OF ESTATE. (a) If an estate is recovered on a presumption of death under this chapter and if in a subsequent action or suit it is proved that the person presumed dead is living, the estate shall be restored to that person. The estate shall be restored with the rents and profits of the estate with legal interest for the time the person was deprived of the estate.

(b) A person delivering an estate or any part of an estate under this section to another under proper order of a court of competent jurisdiction is not liable for the estate or part of the estate.

(c) If the person recovering an estate on a presumption of death sells real property from the estate to a purchaser for value, the right of restoration under this section extends to the recovery of the purchase money received by the person, but does not extend to the recovery of the real property.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 3.15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Civil Practice & Remedies Code Sec. 131.003 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(4), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.